Illinois, session 104th, HB2791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Sections 20, 50, 52, 65.15, 65.70, 65.110, 6and 65.120 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 947/20)8    Sec. 20. Functions of Commission. 9    (a) The Commission, in accordance with this Act, shall 10prepare and supervise the issuance of public information 11concerning its provisions; prescribe the form and regulate the 12submission of applications for assistance; provide for and 13conduct, or cause to be conducted, all eligibility 14determinations of applicants; award the appropriate financial 15assistance; and, upon request by a member of the General 16Assembly, nominate or evaluate and recommend for nomination 17applicants for General Assembly scholarships in accordance 18with criteria specified by the member under Section 30-9 of 19the School Code. 20    (b) The Commission is authorized to participate in any 21programs for monetary assistance to students and to receive, 22hold, and disburse all such funds made available by any agency 23or organization for the purpose or purposes for which they are   HB2791- 2 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1made available. The Commission is authorized to administer a 2program of grant assistance as authorized by the Baccalaureate 3Savings Act. The Commission is authorized to participate in 4any programs established to improve student financial aid 5services or the proficiency of persons engaged in student 6financial aid services and to receive, hold, and disburse all 7funds made available by any agency or organization for the 8purpose or purposes for which they are made available subject 9to the appropriations of the General Assembly. 10    (c) The Commission is authorized to deny a scholarship or 11a grant to any person who has defaulted on a guaranteed student 12loan and who is not maintaining a satisfactory repayment 13record. If a person has a defaulted guaranteed student loan 14but is otherwise eligible for assistance pursuant to Section 1540, the Commission shall award one term of assistance during 16which a satisfactory repayment record must be established. If 17such a repayment record is not established, additional 18assistance shall be denied until a satisfactory repayment 19record is established.20    (d) The Commission is authorized to participate with 21federal, state, county, local, and university law enforcement 22agencies in cooperative efforts to detect and prosecute 23incidents of fraud in student assistance programs.24    (e) The Administrative Review Law shall apply to and 25govern all proceedings for the judicial review of final 26administrative decisions of the Commission.  HB2791- 3 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (f) The Commission is authorized to make all necessary and 2proper rules, not inconsistent with this Act, for the 3efficient exercise of the foregoing functions.4    (g) Unless otherwise provided by statute, the functions of 5the Commission shall be exercised without regard to any 6applicant's race, creed, sex, color, national origin, or 7ancestry.8    (h) The Commission is authorized to establish systems and 9programs to encourage employers to match employee 10contributions to prepaid programs of college savings by making 11donations to the Commission for prepaid programs of college 12savings to make higher education affordable for all residents 13of the State and to receive, hold, and disburse all such funds 14made available through those programs for the purposes for 15which they are authorized by rule or by law. 16    (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 17contrary, on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 18104th General Assembly, any recipient of a scholarship, grant, 19or waiver that has been or may be converted to a student loan 20under a State program for which the Commission is responsible 21for collections shall be released from the remaining financial 22repayment obligations under that program. This includes 23financial repayment obligations under Section 50, 52, 65.15, 2465.70, 65.110, or 65.120, the Nursing Education Scholarship 25Law, or any other similarly structured State scholarship, 26grant, or waiver program for which the Commission is or may   HB2791- 4 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1become responsible for collections.2    The release from financial repayment obligations under 3this subsection (i) applies only to financial repayment 4obligations resulting from a recipient's failure to complete 5any required employment obligation under the terms of the 6scholarship, grant, or waiver. The release does not apply to 7amounts owed to the Commission for other reasons, including, 8but not limited to, error, fraud, rescission of funds, or 9because a recipient ceased to be eligible for the amount 10initially awarded. 11(Source: P.A. 96-198, eff. 8-10-09.) 12    (110 ILCS 947/50)13    Sec. 50. Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship 14program. 15    (a) As used in this Section:16        "Eligible applicant" means a minority student who has 17    graduated from high school or has received a State of 18    Illinois High School Diploma and has maintained a 19    cumulative grade point average of no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 20    scale, and who by reason thereof is entitled to apply for 21    scholarships to be awarded under this Section. 22        "Minority student" means a student who is any of the 23    following:24            (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person 25        having origins in any of the original peoples of North   HB2791- 5 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1        and South America, including Central America, and who 2        maintains tribal affiliation or community attachment).3            (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 4        original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or 5        the Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited 6        to, Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, 7        Pakistan, the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and 8        Vietnam).9            (3) Black or African American (a person having 10        origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa).11            (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, 12        Mexican, Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or 13        other Spanish culture or origin, regardless of race).14            (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 15        person having origins in any of the original peoples 16        of Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands). 17        "Qualified bilingual minority applicant" means a 18    qualified student who demonstrates proficiency in a 19    language other than English by (i) receiving a State Seal 20    of Biliteracy from the State Board of Education or (ii) 21    receiving a passing score on an educator licensure target 22    language proficiency test. 23        "Qualified student" means a person (i) who is a 24    resident of this State and a citizen or permanent resident 25    of the United States; (ii) who is a minority student, as 26    defined in this Section; (iii) who, as an eligible   HB2791- 6 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    applicant, has made a timely application for a minority 2    teaching scholarship under this Section; (iv) who is 3    enrolled on at least a half-time basis at a qualified 4    Illinois institution of higher learning; (v) who is 5    enrolled in a course of study leading to teacher 6    licensure, including alternative teacher licensure, or, if 7    the student is already licensed to teach, in a course of 8    study leading to an additional teaching endorsement or a 9    master's degree in an academic field in which he or she is 10    teaching or plans to teach or who has received one or more 11    College and Career Pathway Endorsements pursuant to 12    Section 80 of the Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness 13    Act and commits to enrolling in a course of study leading 14    to teacher licensure, including alternative teacher 15    licensure; (vi) who maintains a grade point average of no 16    less than 2.5 on a 4.0 scale; and (vii) who continues to 17    advance satisfactorily toward the attainment of a degree. 18    (b) In order to encourage academically talented Illinois 19minority students to pursue teaching careers at the preschool 20or elementary or secondary school level and to address and 21alleviate the teacher shortage crisis in this State described 22under the provisions of the Transitions in Education Act, each 23qualified student shall be awarded a minority teacher 24scholarship to any qualified Illinois institution of higher 25learning. However, preference may be given to qualified 26applicants enrolled at or above the junior level.   HB2791- 7 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (c) Each minority teacher scholarship awarded under this 2Section shall be in an amount sufficient to pay the tuition and 3fees and room and board costs of the qualified Illinois 4institution of higher learning at which the recipient is 5enrolled, up to an annual maximum of $5,000; except that in the 6case of a recipient who does not reside on-campus at the 7institution at which he or she is enrolled, the amount of the 8scholarship shall be sufficient to pay tuition and fee 9expenses and a commuter allowance, up to an annual maximum of 10$5,000. However, if at least $2,850,000 is appropriated in a 11given fiscal year for the Minority Teachers of Illinois 12scholarship program, then, in each fiscal year thereafter, 13each scholarship awarded under this Section shall be in an 14amount sufficient to pay the tuition and fees and room and 15board costs of the qualified Illinois institution of higher 16learning at which the recipient is enrolled, up to an annual 17maximum of $7,500; except that in the case of a recipient who 18does not reside on-campus at the institution at which he or she 19is enrolled, the amount of the scholarship shall be sufficient 20to pay tuition and fee expenses and a commuter allowance, up to 21an annual maximum of $7,500. 22    (d) The total amount of minority teacher scholarship 23assistance awarded by the Commission under this Section to an 24individual in any given fiscal year, when added to other 25financial assistance awarded to that individual for that year, 26shall not exceed the cost of attendance at the institution at   HB2791- 8 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1which the student is enrolled. If the amount of a minority 2teacher scholarship to be awarded to a qualified student as 3provided in subsection (c) of this Section exceeds the cost of 4attendance at the institution at which the student is 5enrolled, the minority teacher scholarship shall be reduced by 6an amount equal to the amount by which the combined financial 7assistance available to the student exceeds the cost of 8attendance. 9    (e) The maximum number of academic terms for which a 10qualified student can receive minority teacher scholarship 11assistance shall be 8 semesters or 12 quarters. 12    (f) In any academic year for which an eligible applicant 13under this Section accepts financial assistance through the 14Paul Douglas Teacher Scholarship Program, as authorized by 15Section 551 et seq. of the Higher Education Act of 1965, the 16applicant shall not be eligible for scholarship assistance 17awarded under this Section. 18    (g) All applications for minority teacher scholarships to 19be awarded under this Section shall be made to the Commission 20on forms which the Commission shall provide for eligible 21applicants. The form of applications and the information 22required to be set forth therein shall be determined by the 23Commission, and the Commission shall require eligible 24applicants to submit with their applications such supporting 25documents or recommendations as the Commission deems 26necessary.   HB2791- 9 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (h) Subject to a separate appropriation for such purposes, 2payment of any minority teacher scholarship awarded under this 3Section shall be determined by the Commission. All scholarship 4funds distributed in accordance with this subsection shall be 5paid to the institution and used only for payment of the 6tuition and fee and room and board expenses incurred by the 7student in connection with his or her attendance at a 8qualified Illinois institution of higher learning. Any 9minority teacher scholarship awarded under this Section shall 10be applicable to 2 semesters or 3 quarters of enrollment. If a 11qualified student withdraws from enrollment prior to 12completion of the first semester or quarter for which the 13minority teacher scholarship is applicable, the school shall 14refund to the Commission the full amount of the minority 15teacher scholarship. 16    (i) The Commission shall administer the minority teacher 17scholarship aid program established by this Section and shall 18make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent with this 19Section for its effective implementation. 20    (j) When an appropriation to the Commission for a given 21fiscal year is insufficient to provide scholarships to all 22qualified students, the Commission shall allocate the 23appropriation in accordance with this subsection. If funds are 24insufficient to provide all qualified students with a 25scholarship as authorized by this Section, the Commission 26shall allocate the available scholarship funds for that fiscal   HB2791- 10 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1year to qualified students who submit a complete application 2form on or before a date specified by the Commission based on 3the following order of priority:4        (1) To students who received a scholarship under this 5    Section in the prior academic year and who remain eligible 6    for a minority teacher scholarship under this Section.7        (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (k), to 8    students who demonstrate financial need, as determined by 9    the Commission. 10    (k) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subsection (j), at 11least 35% of the funds appropriated for scholarships awarded 12under this Section in each fiscal year shall be reserved for 13qualified male minority applicants, with priority being given 14to qualified Black male applicants beginning with fiscal year 152023. If the Commission does not receive enough applications 16from qualified male minorities on or before January 1 of each 17fiscal year to award 35% of the funds appropriated for these 18scholarships to qualified male minority applicants, then the 19Commission may award a portion of the reserved funds to 20qualified female minority applicants in accordance with 21subsection (j). 22    Beginning with fiscal year 2023, if at least $2,850,000 23but less than $4,200,000 is appropriated in a given fiscal 24year for scholarships awarded under this Section, then at 25least 10% of the funds appropriated shall be reserved for 26qualified bilingual minority applicants, with priority being   HB2791- 11 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1given to qualified bilingual minority applicants who are 2enrolled in an educator preparation program with a 3concentration in bilingual, bicultural education. Beginning 4with fiscal year 2023, if at least $4,200,000 is appropriated 5in a given fiscal year for the Minority Teachers of Illinois 6scholarship program, then at least 30% of the funds 7appropriated shall be reserved for qualified bilingual 8minority applicants, with priority being given to qualified 9bilingual minority applicants who are enrolled in an educator 10preparation program with a concentration in bilingual, 11bicultural education. Beginning with fiscal year 2023, if at 12least $2,850,000 is appropriated in a given fiscal year for 13scholarships awarded under this Section but the Commission 14does not receive enough applications from qualified bilingual 15minority applicants on or before January 1 of that fiscal year 16to award at least 10% of the funds appropriated to qualified 17bilingual minority applicants, then the Commission may, in its 18discretion, award a portion of the reserved funds to other 19qualified students in accordance with subsection (j). 20    (l) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 21academic year, each recipient of a minority teacher 22scholarship awarded under this Section shall be required by 23the Commission to sign an agreement under which the recipient 24pledges that, within the one-year period following the 25termination of the program for which the recipient was awarded 26a minority teacher scholarship, the recipient (i) shall begin   HB2791- 12 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1teaching for a period of not less than one year for each year 2of scholarship assistance he or she was awarded under this 3Section; (ii) shall fulfill this teaching obligation at a 4nonprofit Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool, 5elementary school, or secondary school at which no less than 630% of the enrolled students are minority students in the year 7during which the recipient begins teaching at the school or 8may instead, if the recipient received a scholarship as a 9qualified bilingual minority applicant, fulfill this teaching 10obligation in a program in transitional bilingual education 11pursuant to Article 14C of the School Code or in a school in 12which 20 or more English learner students in the same language 13classification are enrolled; and (iii) shall, upon request by 14the Commission, provide the Commission with evidence that he 15or she is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the teaching 16agreement provided for in this subsection. 17    (m) (Blank). If a recipient of a minority teacher 18scholarship awarded under this Section fails to fulfill the 19teaching obligation set forth in subsection (l) of this 20Section, the Commission shall require the recipient to repay 21the amount of the scholarships received, prorated according to 22the fraction of the teaching obligation not completed, at a 23rate of interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, reasonable 24collection fees. If a recipient who enters into repayment 25under this subsection (m) subsequently, within 5 years of 26entering repayment, begins to teach at a school meeting the   HB2791- 13 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1description under subsection (l) of this Section, the 2Commission may reduce the amount owed by the recipient in 3proportion to the amount of the teaching obligation completed. 4The Commission is authorized to establish rules relating to 5its collection activities for repayment of scholarships under 6this Section. All repayments collected under this Section 7shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller for deposit into 8the State's General Revenue Fund.9    (n) (Blank). A recipient of minority teacher scholarship 10shall not be considered in violation of the agreement entered 11into pursuant to subsection (l) if the recipient (i) enrolls 12on a full time basis as a graduate student in a course of study 13related to the field of teaching at a qualified Illinois 14institution of higher learning; (ii) is serving, not in excess 15of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of the United 16States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total disability 17for a period of time not to exceed 3 years as established by 18sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (iv) is seeking and 19unable to find full time employment as a teacher at an Illinois 20public, private, or parochial preschool or elementary or 21secondary school that satisfies the criteria set forth in 22subsection (l) of this Section and is able to provide evidence 23of that fact; (v) becomes a person with a permanent total 24disability as established by sworn affidavit of a qualified 25physician; (vi) is taking additional courses, on at least a 26half-time basis, needed to obtain licensure as a teacher in   HB2791- 14 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1Illinois; or (vii) is fulfilling teaching requirements 2associated with other programs administered by the Commission 3and cannot concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a 4period of time equal to the length of the teaching obligation.5    (o) (Blank). Scholarship recipients under this Section who 6withdraw from a program of teacher education but remain 7enrolled in school to continue their postsecondary studies in 8another academic discipline shall not be required to commence 9repayment of their Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship 10so long as they remain enrolled in school on a full-time basis 11or if they can document for the Commission special 12circumstances that warrant extension of repayment.13    (p) If the Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship 14program does not expend at least 90% of the amount 15appropriated for the program in a given fiscal year for 3 16consecutive fiscal years and the Commission does not receive 17enough applications from the groups identified in subsection 18(k) on or before January 1 in each of those fiscal years to 19meet the percentage reserved for those groups under subsection 20(k), then up to 3% of amount appropriated for the program for 21each of next 3 fiscal years shall be allocated to increasing 22awareness of the program and for the recruitment of Black male 23applicants. The Commission shall make a recommendation to the 24General Assembly by January 1 of the year immediately 25following the end of that third fiscal year regarding whether 26the amount allocated to increasing awareness and recruitment   HB2791- 15 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1should continue.2    (q) Each qualified Illinois institution of higher learning 3that receives funds from the Minority Teachers of Illinois 4scholarship program shall host an annual information session 5at the institution about the program for teacher candidates of 6color in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission. 7Additionally, the institution shall ensure that each 8scholarship recipient enrolled at the institution meets with 9an academic advisor at least once per academic year to 10facilitate on-time completion of the recipient's educator 11preparation program. 12    (r) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-654 13will first take effect with awards made for the 2022-2023 14academic year. 15(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 16102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-448, eff. 8-4-23; revised 7-19-24.) 17    (110 ILCS 947/52)18    Sec. 52. Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program; Golden 19Apple Foundation for Excellence in Teaching. 20    (a) In this Section, "Foundation" means the Golden Apple 21Foundation for Excellence in Teaching, a registered 501(c)(3) 22not-for-profit corporation. 23    (a-2) In order to encourage academically talented Illinois 24students, especially minority students, to pursue teaching 25careers, especially in teacher shortage disciplines (which   HB2791- 16 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1shall be defined to include early childhood education) or at 2hard-to-staff schools (as defined by the Commission in 3consultation with the State Board of Education), to provide 4those students with the crucial mentoring, guidance, and 5in-service support that will significantly increase the 6likelihood that they will complete their full teaching 7commitments and elect to continue teaching in targeted 8disciplines and hard-to-staff schools, and to ensure that 9students in this State will continue to have access to a pool 10of highly qualified highly-qualified teachers, each qualified 11student shall be awarded a Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois 12Program scholarship to any Illinois institution of higher 13learning. The Commission shall administer the Golden Apple 14Scholars of Illinois Program, which shall be managed by the 15Foundation pursuant to the terms of a grant agreement meeting 16the requirements of Section 4 of the Illinois Grant Funds 17Recovery Act.18    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a qualified student 19shall be a student who meets the following qualifications:20        (1) is a resident of this State and a citizen or 21    eligible noncitizen of the United States;22        (2) is a high school graduate or a person who has 23    received a State of Illinois High School Diploma;24        (3) is enrolled or accepted, on at least a half-time 25    basis, at an institution of higher learning;26        (4) is pursuing a postsecondary course of study   HB2791- 17 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    leading to initial certification or pursuing additional 2    course work needed to gain State Board of Education 3    approval to teach, including alternative teacher 4    licensure; and5        (5) is a participant in programs managed by and is 6    approved to receive a scholarship from the Foundation.7    (a-5) (Blank).8    (b) (Blank).9    (b-5) Funds designated for the Golden Apple Scholars of 10Illinois Program shall be used by the Commission for the 11payment of scholarship assistance under this Section or for 12the award of grant funds, subject to the Illinois Grant Funds 13Recovery Act, to the Foundation. Subject to appropriation, 14awards of grant funds to the Foundation shall be made on an 15annual basis and following an application for grant funds by 16the Foundation.17    (b-10) Each year, the Foundation shall include in its 18application to the Commission for grant funds an estimate of 19the amount of scholarship assistance to be provided to 20qualified students during the grant period. Any amount of 21appropriated funds exceeding the estimated amount of 22scholarship assistance may be awarded by the Commission to the 23Foundation for management expenses expected to be incurred by 24the Foundation in providing the mentoring, guidance, and 25in-service supports that will increase the likelihood that 26qualified students will complete their teaching commitments   HB2791- 18 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1and elect to continue teaching in hard-to-staff schools. If 2the estimate of the amount of scholarship assistance described 3in the Foundation's application is less than the actual amount 4required for the award of scholarship assistance to qualified 5students, the Foundation shall be responsible for using 6awarded grant funds to ensure all qualified students receive 7scholarship assistance under this Section.8    (b-15) All grant funds not expended or legally obligated 9within the time specified in a grant agreement between the 10Foundation and the Commission shall be returned to the 11Commission within 45 days. Any funds legally obligated by the 12end of a grant agreement shall be liquidated within 45 days or 13otherwise returned to the Commission within 90 days after the 14end of the grant agreement that resulted in the award of grant 15funds. 16    (c) Each scholarship awarded under this Section shall be 17in an amount sufficient to pay the tuition and fees and room 18and board costs of the Illinois institution of higher learning 19at which the recipient is enrolled, up to an annual maximum of 20$5,000; except that, in the case of a recipient who does not 21reside on campus at the institution of higher learning at 22which he or she is enrolled, the amount of the scholarship 23shall be sufficient to pay tuition and fee expenses and a 24commuter allowance, up to an annual maximum of $5,000. All 25scholarship funds distributed in accordance with this Section 26shall be paid to the institution on behalf of recipients.   HB2791- 19 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (d) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 2the Commission under this Section to an individual in any 3given fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance 4awarded to that individual for that year, shall not exceed the 5cost of attendance at the institution of higher learning at 6which the student is enrolled. In any academic year for which a 7qualified student under this Section accepts financial 8assistance through any other teacher scholarship program 9administered by the Commission, a qualified student shall not 10be eligible for scholarship assistance awarded under this 11Section. 12    (e) A recipient may receive up to 8 semesters or 12 13quarters of scholarship assistance under this Section. 14Scholarship funds are applicable toward 2 semesters or 3 15quarters of enrollment each academic year. 16    (f) All applications for scholarship assistance to be 17awarded under this Section shall be made to the Foundation in a 18form determined by the Foundation. Each year, the Foundation 19shall notify the Commission of the individuals awarded 20scholarship assistance under this Section. Each year, at least 2130% of the Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program 22scholarships shall be awarded to students residing in counties 23having a population of less than 500,000.24    (g) (Blank).25    (h) The Commission shall administer the payment of 26scholarship assistance provided through the Golden Apple   HB2791- 20 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1Scholars of Illinois Program and shall make all necessary and 2proper rules not inconsistent with this Section for the 3effective implementation of this Section.4    (i) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 5academic year, each recipient of a scholarship awarded under 6this Section shall be required by the Foundation to sign an 7agreement under which the recipient pledges that, within the 82-year period following the termination of the academic 9program for which the recipient was awarded a scholarship, the 10recipient: (i) shall begin teaching for a period of not less 11than 5 years, (ii) shall fulfill this teaching obligation at a 12nonprofit Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool or 13an Illinois public elementary or secondary school that 14qualifies for teacher loan cancellation under Section 15465(a)(2)(A) of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 16U.S.C. 1087ee(a)(2)(A)) or other Illinois schools deemed 17eligible for fulfilling the teaching commitment as designated 18by the Foundation, and (iii) shall, upon request of the 19Foundation, provide the Foundation with evidence that he or 20she is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the teaching 21agreement provided for in this subsection. Upon request, the 22Foundation shall provide evidence of teacher fulfillment to 23the Commission. 24    (j) (Blank). If a recipient of a scholarship awarded under 25this Section fails to fulfill the teaching obligation set 26forth in subsection (i) of this Section, the Commission shall   HB2791- 21 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1require the recipient to repay the amount of the scholarships 2received, prorated according to the fraction of the teaching 3obligation not completed, plus interest at a rate of 5% and, if 4applicable, reasonable collection fees. If a recipient who 5enters into repayment under this subsection (j) subsequently, 6within 5 years of entering repayment, begins to teach at a 7school meeting the description under subsection (i) of this 8Section, the Commission may reduce the amount owed by the 9recipient in proportion to the amount of the teaching 10obligation completed. Reduction of the amount owed shall not 11be construed as reinstatement in the Golden Apple Scholars 12program. Reinstatement in the program shall be solely at the 13discretion of the Golden Apple Foundation on terms determined 14by the Foundation. Payments received by the Commission under 15this subsection (j) shall be remitted to the State Comptroller 16for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, except that that 17portion of a recipient's repayment that equals the amount in 18expenses that the Commission has reasonably incurred in 19attempting collection from that recipient shall be remitted to 20the State Comptroller for deposit into the ISAC Accounts 21Receivable Fund, a special fund in the State treasury.22    (k) (Blank). A recipient of a scholarship awarded by the 23Foundation under this Section shall not be considered to have 24failed to fulfill the teaching obligations of the agreement 25entered into pursuant to subsection (i) if the recipient (i) 26enrolls on a full-time basis as a graduate student in a course   HB2791- 22 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1of study related to the field of teaching at an institution of 2higher learning; (ii) is serving as a member of the armed 3services of the United States; (iii) is a person with a 4temporary total disability, as established by sworn affidavit 5of a qualified physician; (iv) is seeking and unable to find 6full-time employment as a teacher at a school that satisfies 7the criteria set forth in subsection (i) and is able to provide 8evidence of that fact; (v) is taking additional courses, on at 9least a half-time basis, needed to obtain certification as a 10teacher in Illinois; (vi) is fulfilling teaching requirements 11associated with other programs administered by the Commission 12and cannot concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a 13period of time equal to the length of the teaching obligation; 14or (vii) is participating in a program established under 15Executive Order 10924 of the President of the United States or 16the federal National Community Service Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 1712501 et seq.). Any such extension of the period during which 18the teaching requirement must be fulfilled shall be subject to 19limitations of duration as established by the Commission.20    (l) (Blank). A recipient who fails to fulfill the teaching 21obligations of the agreement entered into pursuant to 22subsection (i) of this Section shall repay the amount of 23scholarship assistance awarded to them under this Section 24within 10 years.25    (m) Annually, at a time determined by the Commission in 26consultation with the Foundation, the Foundation shall submit   HB2791- 23 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1a report to assist the Commission in monitoring the 2Foundation's performance of grant activities. The report shall 3describe the following:4        (1) the Foundation's anticipated expenditures for the 5    next fiscal year;6        (2) the number of qualified students receiving 7    scholarship assistance at each institution of higher 8    learning where a qualified student was enrolled under this 9    Section during the previous fiscal year;10        (3) the total monetary value of scholarship funds paid 11    to each institution of higher learning at which a 12    qualified student was enrolled during the previous fiscal 13    year;14        (4) the number of scholarship recipients who completed 15    a baccalaureate degree during the previous fiscal year;16        (5) the number of scholarship recipients who reported 17    that they had fulfilled their teaching obligation during 18    the previous fiscal year;19        (6) the number of scholarship recipients who reported 20    that they had failed to fulfill their teaching obligation 21    during the previous fiscal year;22        (7) (blank); the number of scholarship recipients 23    granted an extension described in subsection (k) of this 24    Section during the previous fiscal year;25        (8) (blank); the number of scholarship recipients 26    required to repay scholarship assistance in accordance   HB2791- 24 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    with subsection (j) of this Section during the previous 2    fiscal year;3        (9) (blank); the number of scholarship recipients who 4    successfully repaid scholarship assistance in full during 5    the previous fiscal year;6        (10) (blank); the number of scholarship recipients who 7    defaulted on their obligation to repay scholarship 8    assistance during the previous fiscal year;9        (11) (blank); the amount of scholarship assistance 10    subject to collection in accordance with subsection (j) of 11    this Section at the end of the previous fiscal year;12        (12) (blank); and the amount of collected funds to be 13    remitted to the Comptroller in accordance with subsection 14    (j) of this Section at the end of the previous fiscal year; 15    and16        (13) other information that the Commission may 17    reasonably request. 18    (n) Nothing in this Section shall affect the rights of the 19Commission to collect information on the completion of 20teaching obligations moneys owed to it by recipients of 21scholarship assistance through the Illinois Future Teacher 22Corps Program, repealed by Public Act 98-533.23    (o) The Auditor General shall prepare an annual audit of 24the operations and finances of the Golden Apple Scholars of 25Illinois Program. This audit shall be provided to the 26Governor, General Assembly, and the Commission.  HB2791- 25 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (p) The suspension of grant making authority found in 2Section 4.2 of the Illinois Grant Funds Recovery Act shall not 3apply to grants made pursuant to this Section. 4(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 5103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-448, eff. 8-4-23; revised 610-16-24.) 7    (110 ILCS 947/65.15)8    Sec. 65.15. Special education teacher scholarships. 9    (a) There shall be awarded annually 250 scholarships to 10persons qualifying as members of any of the following groups:11        (1) Students who are otherwise qualified to receive a 12    scholarship as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this 13    Section and who make application to the Commission for 14    such scholarship and agree to take courses that will 15    prepare the student for the teaching of children described 16    in Section 14-1 of the School Code. 17        (2) Persons holding a valid certificate issued under 18    the laws relating to the certification of teachers and who 19    make application to the Commission for such scholarship 20    and agree to take courses that will prepare them for the 21    teaching of children described in Section 14-1 of the 22    School Code. 23        (3) Persons who (A) have graduated high school; (B) 24    have not been certified as a teacher; and (C) make 25    application to the Commission for such scholarship and   HB2791- 26 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    agree to take courses that will prepare them for the 2    teaching of children described in Section 14-1 of the 3    School Code. 4    Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be issued 5pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Commission; 6provided that no rule or regulation promulgated by the State 7Board of Education prior to the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of 1993 pursuant to the exercise of any right, 9power, duty, responsibility or matter of pending business 10transferred from the State Board of Education to the 11Commission under this Section shall be affected thereby, and 12all such rules and regulations shall become the rules and 13regulations of the Commission until modified or changed by the 14Commission in accordance with law. 15    For the purposes of this Section scholarships awarded each 16school year shall be deemed to be issued on July 1 of the year 17prior to the start of the postsecondary school term and all 18calculations for use of the scholarship shall be based on such 19date. Each scholarship shall entitle its holder to exemption 20from fees as provided in subsection (a) of Section 65.40 while 21enrolled in a special education program of teacher education, 22for a period of not more than 4 calendar years and shall be 23available for use at any time during such period of study 24except as provided in subsection (b) of Section 65.40. 25    Scholarships issued to holders of a valid certificate 26issued under the laws relating to the certification of   HB2791- 27 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1teachers as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection may 2also entitle the holder thereof to a program of teacher 3education that will prepare the student for the teaching of 4children described in Section 14-1 of the School Code at the 5graduate level. 6    (b) The principal, or his or her designee, of an approved 7high school shall certify to the Commission, for students who 8are Illinois residents and are completing an application, that 9the students ranked scholastically in the upper one-half of 10their graduating class at the end of the sixth semester. 11    (c) Each holder of a scholarship must furnish proof to the 12Commission, in such form and at such intervals as the 13Commission prescribes, of the holder's continued enrollment in 14a teacher education program qualifying the holder for the 15scholarship. Any holder of a scholarship who fails to register 16in a special education program of teacher education at the 17university within 10 days after the commencement of the term, 18quarter or semester immediately following the receipt of the 19scholarship or who, having registered, withdraws from the 20university or transfers out of teacher education, shall 21thereupon forfeit the right to use it and it may be granted to 22the person having the next highest rank as shown on the list 23held by the Commission. If the person having the next highest 24rank, within 10 days after notification thereof by the 25Commission, fails to register at any such university in a 26special education program of teacher education, or who, having   HB2791- 28 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1registered, withdraws from the university or transfers out of 2teacher education, the scholarship may then be granted to the 3person shown on the list as having the rank next below such 4person. 5    (d) Any person accepting who has accepted a scholarship 6under the preceding subsections of this Section must sign an 7agreement pledging (i) that, within one year after graduation 8from or termination of enrollment in a teacher education 9program, the recipient will begin teaching at a nonprofit 10Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool, or 11elementary school, or secondary school for a period of at 12least 2 of the 5 years immediately following that graduation 13or termination and (ii) that the recipient will provide the 14Commission, upon the Commission's request, with evidence that 15the recipient is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the 16teaching agreement provided for in this subsection. , 17excluding, however, from the computation of that 5 year period 18(i) any time up to 3 years spent in the military service, 19whether such service occurs before or after the person 20graduates; (ii) any time that person is enrolled full-time in 21an academic program related to the field of teaching leading 22to a graduate or postgraduate degree; (iii) the time that 23person is a person with a temporary total disability for a 24period of time not to exceed 3 years, as established by the 25sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (iv) the time that 26person is seeking and unable to find full time employment as a   HB2791- 29 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1teacher at an Illinois public, private, or parochial school; 2(v) the time that person is taking additional courses, on at 3least a half-time basis, needed to obtain certification as a 4teacher in Illinois; or (vi) the time that person is 5fulfilling teaching requirements associated with other 6programs administered by the Commission if he or she cannot 7concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a period of 8time equal to the length of the teaching obligation. 9    A person who has accepted a scholarship under the 10preceding subsections of this Section and who has been unable 11to fulfill the teaching requirements of this Section may 12receive a deferment from the obligation of repayment under 13this subsection (d) under guidelines established by the 14Commission; provided that no guideline established for any 15such purpose by the State Board of Education prior to the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of 1993 shall be 17affected by the transfer to the Commission of the 18responsibility for administering and implementing the 19provisions of this Section, and all guidelines so established 20shall become the guidelines of the Commission until modified 21or changed by the Commission. 22    Any such person who fails to fulfill this teaching 23requirement shall pay to the Commission the amount of tuition 24waived by virtue of his or her acceptance of the scholarship, 25together with interest at 5% per year on that amount. However, 26this obligation to repay the amount of tuition waived plus   HB2791- 30 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1interest does not apply when the failure to fulfill the 2teaching requirement results from the death or adjudication as 3a person under legal disability of the person holding the 4scholarship, and no claim for repayment may be filed against 5the estate of such a decedent or person under legal 6disability. If a recipient who enters into repayment under 7this paragraph subsequently, within 5 years of entering 8repayment, begins to teach at a school meeting the description 9under this subsection (d), the Commission may reduce the 10amount owed by the recipient in proportion to the amount of the 11teaching obligation completed. Payments received by the 12Commission under this subsection (d) shall be remitted to the 13State Treasurer for deposit in the General Revenue Fund. Each 14person receiving a scholarship shall be provided with a 15description of the provisions of this subsection (d) at the 16time he or she qualifies for the benefits of such a 17scholarship. 18    (e) (Blank). This Section is basically the same as 19Sections 30-1, 30-2, 30-3, and 30-4a of the School Code, which 20are repealed by this amendatory Act of 1993, and shall be 21construed as a continuation of the teacher scholarship program 22established by that prior law, and not as a new or different 23teacher scholarship program. The State Board of Education 24shall transfer to the Commission, as the successor to the 25State Board of Education for all purposes of administering and 26implementing the provisions of this Section, all books,   HB2791- 31 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1accounts, records, papers, documents, contracts, agreements, 2and pending business in any way relating to the teacher 3scholarship program continued under this Section; and all 4scholarships at any time awarded under that program by, and 5all applications for any such scholarships at any time made 6to, the State Board of Education shall be unaffected by the 7transfer to the Commission of all responsibility for the 8administration and implementation of the teacher scholarship 9program continued under this Section. The State Board of 10Education shall furnish to the Commission such other 11information as the Commission may request to assist it in 12administering this Section. 13(Source: P.A. 103-448, eff. 8-4-23.) 14    (110 ILCS 947/65.70)15    Sec. 65.70. Optometric Education Scholarship Program. 16    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that the 17provision of graduate education leading to a doctoral degree 18in optometry for persons of this State who desire such an 19education is important to the health and welfare of this State 20and Nation and, consequently, is an important public purpose. 21Many qualified potential optometrists are deterred by 22financial considerations from pursuing their optometric 23education with consequent irreparable loss to the State and 24Nation of talents vital to health and welfare. A program of 25scholarships for individuals who pledge to practice , repayment   HB2791- 32 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1of which may be excused if the individual practices 2professional optometry in this State, will enable such 3individuals to attend qualified public or private institutions 4of their choice in the State.5    (b) Beginning with the 2003-2004 academic year, the 6Commission shall, each year, consider applications for 7scholarship assistance under this Section. An applicant is 8eligible for a scholarship under this Section if the 9Commission finds that the applicant is: 10        (1) a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen; 11        (2) a resident of Illinois; and 12        (3) enrolled on a full-time basis in a public or 13    private college of optometry located in this State that 14    awards a doctorate degree in optometry and is approved by 15    the Department of Professional Regulation.16    (c) Each year the Commission shall award 10 scholarships 17under this Section among applicants qualified pursuant to 18subsection (b). Two of these scholarships each shall be 19awarded to eligible applicants enrolled in their first year, 20second year, third year, and fourth year. The remaining 2 21scholarships shall be awarded to any level of student. The 22Commission shall receive funding for the scholarships through 23appropriations from the Optometric Licensing and Disciplinary 24Board Fund. If in any year the number of qualified applicants 25exceeds the number of scholarships to be awarded, the 26Commission shall give priority in awarding scholarships to   HB2791- 33 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1students demonstrating exceptional merit and who are in 2financial need. A scholarship shall be in the amount of $5,000 3each year applicable to tuition and fees.4    (d) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 5the Commission under this Section to an individual in any 6given fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance 7awarded to that individual for that year, shall not exceed the 8cost of attendance at the institution at which the student is 9enrolled.10    (e) A recipient may receive up to 8 semesters or 12 11quarters of scholarship assistance under this Section.12    (f) Subject to a separate appropriation made for such 13purposes, payment of any scholarship awarded under this 14Section shall be determined by the Commission. All scholarship 15funds distributed in accordance with this Section shall be 16paid to the institution on behalf of the recipients. 17Scholarship funds are applicable toward 2 semesters or 3 18quarters of enrollment within an academic year.19    (g) The Commission shall administer the Optometric 20Education Scholarship Program established by this Section and 21shall make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent 22with this Section for its effective implementation.23    (h) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 24academic year, each recipient of a scholarship awarded under 25this Section shall be required by the Commission to sign an 26agreement under which the recipient pledges that, within the   HB2791- 34 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1one-year period following the termination of the academic 2program for which the recipient was awarded a scholarship, the 3recipient shall practice in this State as a licensed 4optometrist under the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987 5for a period of not less than one year for each year of 6scholarship assistance awarded under this Section. Each 7recipient shall, upon request of the Commission, provide the 8Commission with evidence that the recipient he or she is 9fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the practice 10agreement provided for in this subsection.11    (i) (Blank). If a recipient of a scholarship awarded under 12this Section fails to fulfill the practice obligation set 13forth in subsection (h) of this Section, the Commission shall 14require the recipient to repay the amount of the scholarships 15received, prorated according to the fraction of the obligation 16not completed, plus interest at a rate of 5% and, if 17applicable, reasonable collection fees. The Commission is 18authorized to establish rules relating to its collection 19activities for repayment of scholarships under this Section.20    (j) (Blank). A recipient of a scholarship awarded by the 21Commission under this Section shall not be in violation of the 22agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (h) if the 23recipient (i) is serving as a member of the armed services of 24the United States; (ii) is enrolled in a residency program 25following graduation at an approved institution; (iii) is a 26person with a temporary total disability, as established by   HB2791- 35 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; or (iii) cannot 2fulfill the employment obligation due to his or her death, 3disability, or incompetency, as established by sworn affidavit 4of a qualified physician. No claim for repayment may be filed 5against the estate of such a decedent or incompetent. Any 6extension of the period during which the employment 7requirement must be fulfilled shall be subject to limitations 8of duration as established by the Commission.9(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 10    (110 ILCS 947/65.110)11    Sec. 65.110. Post-Master of Social Work School Social Work 12Professional Educator License scholarship.13    (a) Subject to appropriation, beginning with awards for 14the 2022-2023 academic year, the Commission shall award 15annually up to 250 Post-Master of Social Work School Social 16Work Professional Educator License scholarships to a person 17who:18        (1) holds a valid Illinois-licensed clinical social 19    work license or social work license;20        (2) has obtained a master's degree in social work from 21    an approved program;22        (3) is a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen; 23    and24        (4) submits an application to the Commission for such 25    scholarship and agrees to take courses to obtain an   HB2791- 36 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    Illinois Professional Educator License with an endorsement 2    in School Social Work.3    (b) If an appropriation for this Section for a given 4fiscal year is insufficient to provide scholarships to all 5qualified applicants, the Commission shall allocate the 6appropriation in accordance with this subsection (b). If funds 7are insufficient to provide all qualified applicants with a 8scholarship as authorized by this Section, the Commission 9shall allocate the available scholarship funds for that fiscal 10year to qualified applicants who submit a complete application 11on or before a date specified by the Commission, based on the 12following order of priority:13        (1) firstly, to students who received a scholarship 14    under this Section in the prior academic year and who 15    remain eligible for a scholarship under this Section;16        (2) secondly, to new, qualified applicants who are 17    members of a racial minority, as defined in subsection 18    (c); and19        (3) finally, to other new, qualified applicants in 20    accordance with this Section. 21    (c) Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be 22issued pursuant to rules adopted by the Commission. In 23awarding scholarships, the Commission shall give priority to 24those applicants who are members of a racial minority. Racial 25minorities are underrepresented as school social workers in 26elementary and secondary schools in this State, and the   HB2791- 37 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of this State 2to provide them with priority consideration for programs that 3encourage their participation in this field and thereby foster 4a profession that is more reflective of the diversity of 5Illinois students and the parents they will serve. A more 6reflective workforce in school social work allows improved 7outcomes for students and a better utilization of services. 8Therefore, the Commission shall give priority to those 9applicants who are members of a racial minority. In this 10subsection (c), "racial minority" means a person who is a 11citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent resident of 12the United States and who is:13        (1) Black (a person having origins in any of the black 14    racial groups in Africa);15        (2) Hispanic (a person of Spanish or Portuguese 16    culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, 17    or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race);18        (3) Asian American (a person having origins in any of 19    the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the 20    Indian Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands); or21        (4) American Indian or Alaskan Native (a person having 22    origins in any of the original peoples of North America). 23    (d) Each scholarship shall be applied to the payment of 24tuition and mandatory fees at the University of Illinois, 25Southern Illinois University, Chicago State University, 26Eastern Illinois University, Governors State University,   HB2791- 38 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois University, 2Northern Illinois University, and Western Illinois University. 3Each scholarship may be applied to pay tuition and mandatory 4fees required to obtain an Illinois Professional Educator 5License with an endorsement in School Social Work.6    (e) The Commission shall make tuition and fee payments 7directly to the qualified institution of higher learning that 8the applicant attends.9    (f) Any person accepting who has accepted a scholarship 10under this Section must sign an agreement pledging (i) that, 11within one year after graduation or termination of enrollment 12in a Post-Master of Social Work Professional Education License 13with an endorsement in School Social Work program, the 14recipient will begin working as a school social worker at a 15public or nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, elementary 16school, or secondary school located in this State for at least 172 of the 5 years immediately following that graduation or 18termination and (ii) that the recipient shall, upon request of 19the Commission, provide the Commission with evidence that the 20recipient is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the work 21agreement provided for in this subsection. , excluding, 22however, from the computation of that 5-year period: (i) any 23time up to 3 years spent in the military service, whether such 24service occurs before or after the person graduates; (ii) the 25time that person is a person with a temporary total disability 26for a period of time not to exceed 3 years, as established by   HB2791- 39 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; and (iii) the 2time that person is seeking and unable to find full-time 3employment as a school social worker at a State public or 4nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or 5secondary school.6    (g) (Blank). If a recipient of a scholarship under this 7Section fails to fulfill the work obligation set forth in 8subsection (f), the Commission shall require the recipient to 9repay the amount of the scholarships received, prorated 10according to the fraction of the obligation not completed, at 11a rate of interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, reasonable 12collection fees. The Commission is authorized to establish 13rules relating to its collection activities for repayment of 14scholarships under this Section. All repayments collected 15under this Section shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller 16for deposit into this State's General Revenue Fund.17    A recipient of a scholarship under this Section is not 18considered to be in violation of the failure to fulfill the 19work obligation under subsection (f) if the recipient (i) 20enrolls on a full-time basis as a graduate student in a course 21of study related to the field of social work at a qualified 22Illinois institution of higher learning; (ii) is serving, not 23in excess of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of the 24United States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total 25disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 years, as 26established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician;   HB2791- 40 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1(iv) is seeking and unable to find full-time employment as a 2school social worker at an Illinois public or nonpublic 3not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or secondary 4school that satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection (f) 5and is able to provide evidence of that fact; or (v) becomes a 6person with a permanent total disability, as established by 7the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician.8(Source: P.A. 102-621, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 10    (110 ILCS 947/65.120)11    Sec. 65.120. iGROW Tech Scholarship Program.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "Eligible applicant" means a student who has graduated 14from high school or has received a State of Illinois High 15School Diploma, who has maintained a cumulative grade point 16average of no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, who is pursuing or 17intends to pursue a qualifying degree in a qualified 18institution, and who is entitled to apply for assistance under 19this Section.20    "Full-time" means the number of credit hours the 21Commission determines is full-time enrollment for a student 22for purposes of the program created under this Section.23    "Minority student" has the same meaning as the term is 24defined under Section 50 of the Higher Education Student 25Assistance Act (110 ILCS 947).  HB2791- 41 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    "Program" means the iGROW Tech Scholarship Program created 2under this Section.3    "Qualifying degree" means an associate or a bachelor's 4degree granted by a qualified institution in the field of 5computer information sciences; information technology; 6information science; computer science; computer systems 7networking and telecommunications; computer and information 8systems security or information assurance, including 9cybersecurity; or management information systems.10    "Qualifying job" means a job with an employer in this 11State performing work that is directly related to the field of 12study that qualified the candidate for assistance under this 13Section.14    "Qualified student" means a person (i) who is a resident 15of this State; (ii) who, as an eligible applicant, has made a 16timely application for an iGROW tech scholarship under this 17Section; (iii) who is enrolled on at least a half-time basis at 18a qualified institution; (iv) who is enrolled in a course of 19study in the field of computer and information sciences; 20information technology; information science; computer science; 21computer systems networking and telecommunications; computer 22and information systems security or information assurance, 23including cybersecurity; or management information systems; 24(v) who maintains a grade point average of no less than a 2.5 25on a 4.0 scale; and (vi) who continues to advance 26satisfactorily toward the attainment of a degree.  HB2791- 42 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    "Recipient" means an Illinois resident enrolled in a 2qualified institution who receives an award under this 3Section.4    (b) Subject to appropriation, and no sooner than the 52024-2025 academic year, there is established the Illinois 6Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) Tech Scholarship 7Program to recruit and train individuals to work in technology 8jobs that have a high demand for new employees and offer high 9wages by awarding scholarships.10    (c) Each iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section 11shall be determined by the Commission in an amount up to and 12including the full costs of tuition and fees and room and board 13of the qualified institution at which the recipient is 14enrolled if the institution is public, or an equivalent rate 15established by the Commission for private institutions. The 16total amount of iGROW tech scholarship assistance awarded by 17the Commission under this Section to an eligible applicant in 18any given fiscal year, when added to other financial 19assistance awarded to that individual for that year, shall not 20exceed the cost of attendance at the institution at which the 21student is enrolled. If the amount of financial assistance to 22be awarded to a qualified student exceeds the cost of 23attendance at the institution at which the student is 24enrolled, the iGROW tech scholarship shall be reduced by an 25amount equal to the amount by which the combined financial 26assistance available to the student exceeds the cost of   HB2791- 43 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1attendance.2    (d) The maximum number of academic terms for which a 3qualified student can receive iGROW tech scholarship 4assistance shall be 8 semesters or 12 quarters.5    (e) All applications for scholarships awarded under this 6Section shall be made to the Commission on forms which the 7Commission shall provide for eligible applicants. The form of 8applications and the information required to be set forth 9therein shall be determined by the Commission, and the 10Commission shall require eligible applicants to submit with 11their applications such supporting documents or 12recommendations as the Commission deems necessary.13    (f) Subject to appropriation for such purposes, payment of 14any iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section shall be 15determined by the Commission. All scholarship funds 16distributed in accordance with this subsection shall be paid 17to the qualified institution and used only for payment of the 18tuition and fees assessed by the institution and the standard 19housing and food allowance used for all undergraduate students 20by the qualified student in connection with his or her 21attendance at a qualified institution.22    Any iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section 23shall be applicable to 2 semesters or 3 quarters of enrollment 24annually. The qualified institution can only request payment 25for tuition and fees up to the amount of actual tuition and fee 26expenses incurred.  HB2791- 44 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    If a student withdraws after the expiration of the tuition 2refund or withdrawal adjustment period, the student may 3receive payment for tuition and fees incurred up to the term 4award. The housing and food allowance shall be prorated based 5on the qualified institution's return of funds policy.6    (g) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 7academic year, each recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship 8awarded under this Section shall be required by the Commission 9to sign an agreement under which the recipient pledges that 10the recipient (i) shall work in the State in a qualified job 11for a period of not less than one year for each year of 12scholarship assistance he or she was awarded under this 13Section; however, in no event shall he or she agree to work in 14the State in a qualified job for a period of less than 2 years; 15and (ii) shall, upon request by the Commission, provide the 16Commission with evidence that he or she is fulfilling or has 17fulfilled the terms of the agreement provided for in this 18subsection.19    If a recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship awarded under 20this Section fails to fulfill the obligations set forth in 21this subsection, the Commission shall require the recipient to 22repay the amount of the scholarships received, prorated 23according to the fraction of the employment obligation not 24completed, at a rate of interest equal to 5%, and, if 25applicable, reasonable collection fees. The Commission is 26authorized to establish rules relating to its collection   HB2791- 45 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1activities for repayment of scholarships under this Section. 2All repayments collected under this Section shall be forwarded 3to the State Comptroller for deposit into the State's General 4Revenue Fund.5    A recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship shall not be 6considered in violation of the agreement entered into pursuant 7to this subsection if the recipient (I) enrolls on a full-time 8basis as a graduate student in a course of study related to the 9technology degree for which he or she qualified for the iGROW 10tech scholarship at a qualified institution; (II) is serving, 11not in excess of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of 12the United States; (III) is a person with a temporary total 13disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 years as 14established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (IV) 15is seeking and unable to find full-time employment with a 16State employer that satisfies the criteria set forth in this 17subsection and is able to provide evidence of that fact; (V) 18becomes a person with a permanent total disability as 19established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; or 20(VI) meets any other criteria that the Commission may deem 21necessary.22    (h) (Blank.) Scholarship recipients under this Section who 23withdraw from a program of computer science or other related 24major area of study provided under this Section but remain 25enrolled in school to continue their postsecondary studies in 26another academic discipline shall not be required to commence   HB2791- 46 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1repayment of their iGROW tech scholarship so long as they 2remain enrolled in school on a full-time basis or if they can 3document for the Commission special circumstances that warrant 4extension of repayment.5    (i) If the Program does not expend at least 90% of the 6amount appropriated for the Program in a given fiscal year for 73 consecutive fiscal years on or before January 1 in each of 8those fiscal years, then up to 3% of amount appropriated for 9the Program for each of next 3 fiscal years shall be allocated 10to increasing awareness of the program.11    (j) The Commission shall administer the Program and shall 12make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent with this 13Section for its effective implementation.14    (k) The Commission shall establish a methodology for 15prioritizing applications from applicants who demonstrate a 16financial need or hardship, applications from minority 17students, and applications from applicants demonstrating 18academic excellence. After the first academic year that the 19Program operates, the Commission shall prioritize the 20applications of those applicants who received a scholarship 21under this Section during the prior academic year and who 22remain eligible for a scholarship under this Section.23    (l) Each fiscal year, the Commission may use up to 5% of 24money appropriated for the Program for administration.25    (m) Scholarships may be made under this Section through 26the 2029-30 academic year.  HB2791- 47 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (n) The Illinois Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) 2Tech Scholarship Fund is created as a special fund in the State 3treasury. Moneys in the fund may come from both public 4entities and institutional, organizational, or other private 5entities. All money in the Fund shall be used, subject to 6appropriation, by the Commission to implement and administer 7the Program pursuant to this Section.8(Source: P.A. 103-519, eff. 1-1-24.) 9    Section 10. The Nursing Education Scholarship Law is 10amended by changing Sections 2, 3, 3.1, 4, 6, and 6.5 as 11follows: 12    (110 ILCS 975/2)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2752)13    Sec. 2. Legislative finding and declaration of policy. 14    (a) The General Assembly finds and hereby declares that 15the provision of a higher education leading to an associate 16degree in nursing, an associate degree in applied sciences in 17nursing, a hospital-based diploma in nursing, a baccalaureate 18degree in nursing, a graduate degree in nursing, or a 19certificate in practical nursing for persons of this State who 20desire such an education is important to the health, welfare 21and security of this State and Nation, and consequently is an 22important public purpose. Many qualified and potential nurses 23are deterred by financial considerations from pursuing their 24nursing education, with consequent irreparable loss to the   HB2791- 48 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1State and Nation of talents vital to health, welfare and 2security. A system of scholarships for individuals who plan to 3work in this State as , repayment of which may be excused if the 4individual is employed as a registered professional nurse or a 5licensed practical nurse after obtaining an associate degree 6in nursing, associate degree in applied sciences in nursing, 7hospital-based diploma in nursing, baccalaureate degree in 8nursing, graduate degree in nursing, or certificate in 9practical nursing, will enable such individuals to attend 10approved institutions of their choice in the State, public or 11private.12    (b) The General Assembly finds that there is a critical 13shortage of nursing instructors in this State, and such a 14shortage will only worsen the shortage of available nurses in 15this State and jeopardize the quality of healthcare citizens 16of this State have every right to enjoy. In order to provide 17for the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this 18State, the General Assembly declares that there is a need for 19an increase in skilled nurse educators in this State. 20(Source: P.A. 96-805, eff. 10-30-09.) 21    (110 ILCS 975/3)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2753)22    Sec. 3. Definitions. The following terms, whenever used or 23referred to, have the following meanings except where the 24context clearly indicates otherwise:25    (1) "Board" means the Board of Higher Education created by   HB2791- 49 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1the Board of Higher Education Act.2    (2) "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 3Health.4    (3) "Approved institution" means a public community 5college, private junior college, hospital-based diploma in 6nursing program, or public or private college or university 7with a pre-licensure nursing education program located in this 8State that has approval by the Department of Financial and 9Professional Regulation for an associate degree in nursing 10program, associate degree in applied sciences in nursing 11program, hospital-based diploma in nursing program, 12baccalaureate degree in nursing program, graduate degree in 13nursing program, or certificate in a practical nursing program 14or a post-licensure nursing education program approved by the 15Board of Higher Education or any successor agency with similar 16authority. 17    (4) "Baccalaureate degree in nursing program" means a 18program offered by an approved institution and leading to a 19bachelor of science degree in nursing.20    (5) "Enrollment" means the establishment and maintenance 21of an individual's status as a student in an approved 22institution, regardless of the terms used at the institution 23to describe such status.24    (6) "Academic year" means the period of time from 25September 1 of one year through August 31 of the next year or 26as otherwise defined by the academic institution.  HB2791- 50 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (7) "Associate degree in nursing program or hospital-based 2diploma in nursing program" means a program offered by an 3approved institution and leading to an associate degree in 4nursing, associate degree in applied sciences in nursing, or 5hospital-based diploma in nursing.6    (8) "Graduate degree in nursing program" means a program 7offered by an approved institution and leading to a master of 8science degree in nursing or a doctorate of philosophy or 9doctorate of nursing degree in nursing. 10    (9) "Director" means the Director of the Illinois 11Department of Public Health.12    (10) "Accepted for admission" means a student has 13completed the requirements for entry into an associate degree 14in nursing program, associate degree in applied sciences in 15nursing program, hospital-based diploma in nursing program, 16baccalaureate degree in nursing program, graduate degree in 17nursing program, or certificate in practical nursing program 18at an approved institution, as documented by the institution.19    (11) "Fees" means those mandatory charges, in addition to 20tuition, that all enrolled students must pay, including 21required course or lab fees.22    (12) "Full-time student" means a student enrolled for at 23least 12 hours per term or as otherwise determined by the 24academic institution.25    (13) "Law" means the Nursing Education Scholarship Law.26    (14) "Nursing employment obligation" means employment in   HB2791- 51 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1this State as a registered professional nurse, licensed 2practical nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse in 3direct patient care for at least one year for each year of 4scholarship assistance received through the Nursing Education 5Scholarship Program.6    (15) "Part-time student" means a person who is enrolled 7for at least one-third of the number of hours required per term 8by a school for its full-time students.9    (16) "Practical nursing program" means a program offered 10by an approved institution leading to a certificate in 11practical nursing.12    (17) "Registered professional nurse" means a person who is 13currently licensed as a registered professional nurse by the 14Department of Professional Regulation under the Nurse Practice 15Act.16    (18) "Licensed practical nurse" means a person who is 17currently licensed as a licensed practical nurse by the 18Department of Professional Regulation under the Nurse Practice 19Act.20    (19) "School term" means an academic term, such as a 21semester, quarter, trimester, or number of clock hours, as 22defined by an approved institution.23    (20) "Student in good standing" means a student 24maintaining a cumulative grade point average equivalent to at 25least the academic grade of a "C".26    (21) (Blank). "Total and permanent disability" means a   HB2791- 52 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1physical or mental impairment, disease, or loss of a permanent 2nature that prevents nursing employment with or without 3reasonable accommodation. Proof of disability shall be a 4declaration from the social security administration, Illinois 5Workers' Compensation Commission, Department of Defense, or an 6insurer authorized to transact business in Illinois who is 7providing disability insurance coverage to a contractor.8    (22) "Tuition" means the established charges of an 9institution of higher learning for instruction at that 10institution.11    (23) "Nurse educator" means a person who is currently 12licensed as a registered nurse by the Department of 13Professional Regulation under the Nurse Practice Act, who has 14a graduate degree in nursing, and who is employed by an 15approved academic institution to educate registered nursing 16students, licensed practical nursing students, and registered 17nurses pursuing graduate degrees. 18    (24) "Nurse educator employment obligation" means 19employment in this State as a nurse educator for at least 2 20years for each year of scholarship assistance received under 21Section 6.5 of this Law. 22    (25) "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 23Commission. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement the provisions of this 25Act is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   HB2791- 53 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 5    (110 ILCS 975/3.1)6    Sec. 3.1. Approved institutions. An approved institution 7must maintain compliance with all applicable State and federal 8laws. An approved institution approved to participate in the 9scholarship program under this Law is not necessarily eligible 10for other programs administered by the Commission and is not, 11in order to participate in the program under this Law, 12required to meet the definition of "institution of higher 13learning", "qualified institution", or "institution" as 14defined in Section 10 of the Higher Education Student 15Assistance Act. The Commission may establish by rule 16additional requirements for approved institutions.17(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.) 18    (110 ILCS 975/4)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2754)19    Sec. 4. Functions of Department. The Department shall 20prepare and supervise the issuance of public information about 21the provisions of this Article, ; prescribe the form and 22regulate the submission of applications for scholarships, ; 23determine the eligibility of applicants, ; award the 24appropriate scholarships, and ; prescribe the contracts or   HB2791- 54 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1other acknowledgments of scholarship which an applicant is 2required to execute; and determine whether all or any part of a 3recipient's scholarship needs to be monetarily repaid, or has 4been excused from repayment, and the extent of any repayment 5or excused repayment. The Department may require a recipient 6to reimburse the State for expenses, including but not limited 7to attorney's fees, incurred by the Department or other agent 8of the State for a successful legal action against the 9recipient for a breach of any provision of the scholarship 10contract. The Department is authorized to make all necessary 11and proper rules, not inconsistent with this Article, for the 12efficient exercise of the foregoing functions.13(Source: P.A. 100-872, eff. 8-14-18.) 14    (110 ILCS 975/6)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2756)15    Sec. 6. Nursing requirements for scholarship recipients. 16In accepting a scholarship under Section 5, a recipient must 17pledge that (i) within Within 12 months after graduation from 18an associate degree in nursing program, hospital-based diploma 19in nursing program, baccalaureate degree in nursing program, 20graduate degree in nursing program, or certificate in 21practical nursing program, the any recipient will who accepted 22a scholarship under Section 5 shall begin meeting the required 23nursing employment obligation and (ii) upon request by the 24Commission, the recipient will provide the Commission with 25evidence that the recipient is fulfilling or has fulfilled the   HB2791- 55 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1terms of the agreement provided for in this Section. In order 2to defer his or her continuous employment obligation, a 3recipient must request the deferment in writing from the 4Department. A recipient shall notify program staff within 30 5days if he or she spends up to 4 years in military service 6before or after graduation. A recipient shall notify program 7staff within 30 days if he or she is enrolled in an academic 8program leading to a graduate degree in nursing. If a 9recipient receives funding through the Nursing Education 10Scholarship Program for a higher degree, the nursing 11employment obligation shall be deferred until he or she is no 12longer enrolled or has graduated. The recipient must begin 13meeting the required nursing employment obligations no later 14than 6 months after the end of the deferments.15    Any person who fails to fulfill the nursing employment 16obligation shall pay to the Department an amount equal to the 17amount of scholarship funds received per year for each 18unfulfilled year of the nursing employment obligation, 19together with interest at 7% per year on the unpaid balance. 20Payment must begin within 6 months following the date of the 21occurrence initiating the repayment. All repayments must be 22completed within 6 years from the date of the occurrence 23initiating the repayment. However, this obligation may be 24deferred and re-evaluated every 6 months when the failure to 25fulfill the nursing employment obligation results from 26involuntarily leaving the profession due to a decrease in the   HB2791- 56 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1number of nurses employed in the State or when the failure to 2fulfill the nursing employment obligation results from total 3and permanent disability. The repayment obligation shall be 4excused if the failure to fulfill the nursing employment 5obligation results from the death or adjudication as 6incompetent of the person holding the scholarship. No claim 7for repayment may be filed against the estate of such a 8decedent or incompetent.9    Each person applying for such a scholarship shall be 10provided with a copy of this Section at the time of application 11for the benefits of such scholarship.12(Source: P.A. 92-43, eff. 1-1-02; 93-879, eff. 1-1-05.) 13    (110 ILCS 975/6.5)14    Sec. 6.5. Nurse educator scholarships.15    (a) Beginning with the fall term of the 2009-2010 academic 16year, the Department shall provide scholarships to individuals 17selected from among those applicants who qualify for 18consideration by showing the following:19        (1) that he or she has been a resident of this State 20    for at least one year prior to application and is a citizen 21    or a lawful permanent resident of the United States;22        (2) that he or she is enrolled in or accepted for 23    admission to a graduate degree in nursing program at an 24    approved institution; and25        (3) that he or she agrees to meet the nurse educator   HB2791- 57 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    employment obligation.2    (b) If in any year the number of qualified applicants 3exceeds the number of scholarships to be awarded under this 4Section, the Department shall, in consultation with the 5Illinois Nursing Workforce Center Advisory Board, consider the 6following factors in granting priority in awarding 7scholarships:8        (1) Financial need, as shown on a standardized 9    financial needs assessment form used by an approved 10    institution, of students who will pursue their education 11    on a full-time or close to full-time basis and who already 12    have a diploma in nursing and are pursuing a higher 13    degree.14        (2) A student's status as a registered nurse who is 15    pursuing a graduate degree in nursing to pursue employment 16    in an approved institution that educates licensed 17    practical nurses and that educates registered nurses in 18    undergraduate and graduate nursing programs.19        (3) A student's merit, as shown through his or her 20    grade point average, class rank, experience as a nurse, 21    including supervisory experience, experience as a nurse in 22    the United States military, and other academic and 23    extracurricular activities.24    (c) Unless otherwise indicated, scholarships under this 25Section shall be awarded to recipients at approved 26institutions for a period of up to 3 years.  HB2791- 58 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1    (d) In accepting a scholarship under this Section, a 2recipient must pledge that (i) within Within 12 months after 3graduation from a graduate degree in nursing program for nurse 4educators, the any recipient will who accepted a scholarship 5under this Section shall begin meeting the required nurse 6educator employment obligation and (ii) the recipient will, 7upon request by the Commission, provide the Commission with 8evidence that the recipient is fulfilling or has fulfilled the 9terms of the agreement provided for in this Section. In order 10to defer his or her continuous employment obligation, a 11recipient must request the deferment in writing from the 12Department. A recipient shall receive a deferment if he or she 13notifies the Department, within 30 days after enlisting, that 14he or she is spending up to 4 years in military service. A 15recipient shall receive a deferment if he or she notifies the 16Department, within 30 days after enrolling, that he or she is 17enrolled in an academic program leading to a graduate degree 18in nursing. The recipient must begin meeting the required 19nurse educator employment obligation no later than 6 months 20after the end of the deferment or deferments.21    Any person who fails to fulfill the nurse educator 22employment obligation shall pay to the Department an amount 23equal to the amount of scholarship funds received per year for 24each unfulfilled year of the nurse educator employment 25obligation, together with interest at 7% per year on the 26unpaid balance. Payment must begin within 6 months following   HB2791- 59 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1the date of the occurrence initiating the repayment. All 2repayments must be completed within 6 years from the date of 3the occurrence initiating the repayment. However, this 4repayment obligation may be deferred and re-evaluated every 6 5months when the failure to fulfill the nurse educator 6employment obligation results from involuntarily leaving the 7profession due to a decrease in the number of nurses employed 8in this State or when the failure to fulfill the nurse educator 9employment obligation results from total and permanent 10disability. The repayment obligation shall be excused if the 11failure to fulfill the nurse educator employment obligation 12results from the death or adjudication as incompetent of the 13person holding the scholarship. No claim for repayment may be 14filed against the estate of such a decedent or incompetent.15    The Department may allow a nurse educator employment 16obligation fulfillment alternative if the nurse educator 17scholarship recipient is unsuccessful in finding work as a 18nurse educator. The Department shall maintain a database of 19all available nurse educator positions in this State.20    (e) Each person applying for a scholarship under this 21Section must be provided with a copy of this Section at the 22time of application for the benefits of this scholarship.23    (f) Rulemaking authority to implement this Act is 24conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance with all 25provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and 26all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   HB2791- 60 -LRB104 10549 LNS 20625 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22; 4103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.